FST/hsi/phonetize_hsi_verb.xfst
define vowel ā|a|e|i|o|u;
define consonant b|c|č|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|ṛ|s|š|t|ʰ|v|w|x|y|z;



regex %+V -> "^",,
	%+NFIN -> 0,,
	%+PROG %+IND %+PRS -> progstem %+progsuffix|| _ .#.,,
	%+SBJV -> %<sbjvstem,,
	%+PFV %+IND -> %<perfstem,,
	%+IPFV %+IND -> %<imperfstem,,
	%+PFV %+MASC %+IND -> %<perfstem %+M,,
	%+PFV %+FEM %+IND -> %<perfstem %+W,,
	%+IPFV %+MASC %+IND -> %<imperfstem %+M,,
	%+IPFV %+FEM %+IND -> %<imperfstem %+W,,
	%+SG %+1 -> %+A,,
	%+SG %+2 -> %+B,,
	%+SG %+3 -> %+C,,
	%+PL %+1 -> %+D,,
	%+PL %+2 -> %+E,,
	%+PL %+3 -> %+F;
